Utah statutes.
53A-3-403.   School district fiscal year -- Statistical reports.

(1)  A school district's fiscal year begins on July 1 and ends on June 30.

(2) (a)  The district shall forward statistical reports for the preceding school year, containing items required by law or by the State Board of Education, to the state superintendent not later than November 1 of each year.

(b)  The reports shall include information to enable the state superintendent to complete the statement required under Subsection 53A-1-301(3)(d)(v).

(3)  The district shall forward the accounting report required under Section 51-2a-201 to the state superintendent not later than October 15 of each year.

(4)  The district shall include the following information in its report:

(a)  a summary of the number of students in the district given fee waivers, the number of students who worked in lieu of a waiver, and the total dollar value of student fees waived by the district;

(b)  a copy of the district's fee and fee waiver policy;

(c)  a copy of the district's fee schedule for students; and

(d)  notices of fee waivers provided to a parent or guardian of a student.



Amended by Chapter 206, 2004 General Session

